Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3629
Fee; when assessed.

The fee provided for by section 2-3623 shall be deducted as provided in the Nebraska Corn Resources Act whether such corn is stored in this state or any other state.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 29;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 14.